Utah statutes.
41-6a-1634.   Safety chains on towed vehicles required -- Exceptions.

(1)  A towed vehicle shall be coupled by means of a safety chain, cable or equivalent device, in addition to the regular trailer hitch or coupling.

(2)  Except as provided under Subsection (3), a safety chain, cable or equivalent device shall be:

(a)  securely connected with the chassis of the towing vehicle, the towed vehicle, and the drawbar;

(b) of sufficient material and strength to prevent the two vehicles from becoming separated; and

(c)  attached to:

(i)   have no more slack than is necessary for proper turning;

(ii)   the trailer drawbar to prevent it from dropping to the ground; and

(iii)  assure the towed vehicle follows substantially in the course of the towing vehicle in case the vehicles become separated.

(3)  The provisions of Subsection (2) do not apply to a:

(a)  semitrailer having a connecting device composed of a fifth wheel and king pin assembly; or

(b)  pole trailer.

